Washington statutes.
RCW 10.56.010

Intent.

The legislature recognizes that prosecuting attorneys, law enforcement, and society at large strive for a criminal justice system that minimizes the risk [that] actually innocent people will be convicted. The legislature further recognizes that mistaken identification by witnesses to crime and false testimony by informants who are given benefits in exchange for their testimony have contributed to the conviction of the innocent in Washington state. Through the development of best practices related to the collection of eyewitness evidence and the use of informant witnesses, and the adoption of model guidelines to implement those practices, the legislature aims to improve the quality of such evidence and reduce the risk of wrongful conviction related to these contributing factors.

[ 2019 c 359 s 1.]